Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 8. Removal of Disabilities of a Minor.

Cross references. —

For age of majority, see AS

25.20.010

.

Collateral references. —

42 Am. Jur. 2d, Infants, §§ 30-38.

43 C.J.S., Infants, §§ 235-245.

Evidence of emancipation of child so as to permit parent or representative to maintain tort action against minor child, 60 ALR2d 1284; 62 ALR3d 1299.

What voluntary acts of child, other than marriage or entry in military service, terminate parent’s obligation to support, 32 ALR3d 1055.

Parent’s obligation to support unmarried minor child who refuses to live with parent, 98 ALR3d 334.

Sec. 09.55.590.
Removal of disabilities of minority.

A minor who is a resident of this state and is at least 16 years of age, who is living separate and apart from the parents or guardian of the minor, capable of sustained self-support and of managing one’s own financial affairs, or the legal custodian of such a minor, may petition the superior court to have the disabilities of minority removed for limited or general purposes.

A minor or the legal custodian of a minor may institute a petition under this section in the name of the minor.

The petition for removal of disabilities of minority must state

the name, age, and residence address of the minor;

the name and address of each living parent;

the name and address of the guardian of the person and the guardian of the estate, if any;

the reasons why removal would be in the best interest of the minor; and

the purposes for which removal is sought.

The person who institutes a petition under this section must obtain the consent of each living parent or guardian having control of the person or property of the minor. If the person who is to consent to the petition is unavailable or the whereabouts of that person are unknown, or if a parent or guardian unreasonably withholds consent, the court, acting in the best interest of the minor, may waive this requirement of consent as to that parent or guardian.

The court may appoint an attorney or a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the minor at the hearing. Appointment of an attorney or guardian ad litem shall be made in accordance with AS

25.24.310

.

If the petition under this section is filed by a minor, the court may remove the disabilities of minority as requested in the petition if the court finds on the record after a hearing that the minor is a resident of the state, at least 16 years of age, living separate and apart from the parent or guardian of the minor, and capable of sustained self-support and managing the minor’s own financial affairs. If the petition under this section is filed by the legal custodian of a minor, the court may remove the disabilities of minority as requested in the petition only if the minor consents on the record to the removal of disabilities and the court, in addition to making the other findings required under this subsection for a petition filed by a minor, makes a finding on the record that there is interpersonal conflict involving the legal custodian and the minor that the custodian and the minor have been unable to resolve satisfactorily through other means; the finding must include a description of the efforts that were made by the legal custodian to resolve the interpersonal conflict before the custodian filed the petition under this section. If the court determines that removal of disabilities is in the best interests of the minor, the court may waive the requirement for the minor’s consent that is otherwise imposed under this subsection. In making its decision under this subsection, the court may consider whether a noncustodial parent of the minor is able and willing to petition for custody of the minor.

Except for specific constitutional and statutory age requirements for voting and use of alcoholic beverages, a minor whose disabilities are removed for general purposes has the power and capacity of an adult, including the right to self-control, the right to be domiciled where one desires, the right to receive and control one’s earnings, the right to sue or to be sued, and the capacity to contract.

History.

(§ 2 ch 233 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 1984; am §§ 2 — 7 ch 33 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent in connection with the 1994 amendment of this section, see § 1(b), ch. 33, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (g), deleted “but not limited to” after “including” and added “the right” before “to sue.”

Sec. 09.55.600.
[Renumbered as AS 25.35.010.]

Sec. 09.55.601.
[Renumbered as AS 09.60.070.]

Secs. 09.55.610 — 09.55.640.
[Renumbered as AS 25.35.020 — 25.35.060.]